Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF927.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1034HV (1) 91 sb/js H.F. 927 Section 1. Section 455B.133, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 11. Adopt rules pursuant to section 708C.1 3 prohibiting the intentional emission of air contaminants 4 into the atmosphere within the borders of this state when 5 such emission occurs for the express purpose of affecting 6 temperature, weather, or the intensity of the sunlight. 7 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, rules adopted 8 pursuant to this subsection shall be controlling. 9 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 708C.1 Geoengineering. 10 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the 11 intentional emission of air contaminants into the atmosphere 12 within the borders of this state when such emissions occur for 13 the express purpose of affecting temperature, weather, or the 14 intensity of sunlight is prohibited. 15 2. The environmental protection commission shall adopt 16 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this section. 17 The environmental protection commission may adopt emergency 18 rules under section 17A.4, subsection 3, and section 17A.5, 19 subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , to administer this section and 20 the rules shall be effective immediately upon filing unless a 21 later date is specified in the rules. Any rules adopted in 22 accordance with this subsection shall also be published as a 23 notice of intended action as provided in section 17A.4. 24